Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 5 Venue

Cross references. —

As to change of venue or judge, see §

1-7-101

.

As to venue of action of quo warranto, see §

1-31-109

.

As to venue of application for arbitration, see §

1-36-118

.

As to venue of probate courts, see §§

2-2-102

and

2-2-103

.

As to venue of actions for damages against city on liability insurance, see §

15-1-104

.

As to venue in connection with divorce proceedings, see §

20-2-104

.

As to venue of suits against insurers, see §

26-15-134

.

As to worker's compensation claim when employee was injured out of state, see §

27-14-204

.

As to contested cases under Worker's Compensation Act, see §

27-14-601

, et seq.

As to venue of proceedings before public service commission, see §

37-2-216

.

As to action to recover from utility for loss or damage, see §

37-12-208

.

As to pleading improper venue, see Rule 12(b), W.R.C.P.

As to effect of objection of joined party to venue, see Rule19(a), W.R.C.P.

As to effect of dismissal for improper venue, see Rule 41(b), W.R.C.P.

For provision that rules of civil procedure shall not be construed to extend or limit jurisdiction of courts or venue of actions therein, see Rule 82, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

77 Am. Jur. 2d Venue §§ 1 to 49.

Venue of suit to enjoin nuisance, 7 ALR2d 481.

Relationship between “residence” and “domicile” under venue statutes, 12 ALR2d 757.

What is an action for damages to personal property within venue statute, 29 ALR2d 1270.

Applicability to annulment actions of statutory residence requirements relating to venue in divorce actions, 32 ALR2d 734.

Venue of action for partnership dissolution, settlement or accounting, 33 ALR2d 914.

Venue of wrongful death action, 36 ALR2d 1146.

Retroactive operation and effect of venue statute, 41 ALR2d 798.

Res judicata effect of judgment dismissing action or otherwise denying relief for lack of jurisdiction or venue, 49 ALR2d 1036.

Venue of divorce action in particular county as dependent on residence or domicile for a specified length of time, 54 ALR2d 898.

Validity of contractual provision limiting place or court in which action may be brought, 56 ALR2d 300.

Proper county for bringing replevin or similar possessory action, 60 ALR2d 487.

Venue of action for cutting, destruction or damage of standing timber or trees, 65 ALR2d 1268.

Venue of action for unauthorized geophysical or seismograph survey, 67 ALR2d 444.

Effect on venue of intervention of other stockholders in derivative action, 69 ALR2d 562.

Validity of contractual provision authorizing venue of action in particular place, court or county, 69 ALR2d 1324.

Venue for libel and slander actions, 70 ALR2d 1340.

Venue of action for rescission or cancellation of contract relating to interests in land, 77 ALR2d 1014.

Venue of contribution or indemnity claim arising from payment of judgment or claim in motor vehicle accident case, 84 ALR2d 994.

Prohibition as appropriate remedy to restrain civil action for lack of venue, 93 ALR2d 882.

Sufficiency of contractual designation of place of performance to fix venue at that place under statute authorizing or requiring such venue, 97 ALR2d 934.

Proper place of suit in action on Miller Act bond, 100 ALR2d 456.

Right of defendant to file cross complaint or otherwise seek relief against codefendant or third person in an action pending in the county or district which would not be the proper venue of an independent action in that regard, 100 ALR2d 693.

Venue of damage action for breach of real estate sales contract, 8 ALR3d 489.

Venue of action for libel in newspapers, 15 ALR3d 1249.

Where is embezzlement committed for purposes of territorial jurisdiction or venue, 80 ALR3d 514.

Validity of contractual provision limiting place or court in which action may be brought, 31 ALR4th 404.

Place where claim or cause of action “arose” under state venue statute, 53 ALR4th 1104.

Forum non conveniens in products liability cases, 76 ALR4th 22.

Place where corporation is doing business for purposes of state venue statute, 42 ALR5th 221.

92A C.J.S. Venue § 1 et seq.

§ 1-5-101.
Actions to be brought where real property situated; exceptions.

Actions for the following causes shall be brought in the county in which the subject of the action is situate, except as provided in W.S.

1-5-102

and

1-5-103

:

For the recovery of real property, or of an estate or interest therein;

For the partition of real property;

For the sale of real property under a mortgage, lien or other encumbrance or charge.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 75; R.S. 1887, § 2411; R.S. 1899, § 3496; C.S. 1910, § 4340; C.S. 1920, § 5609; R.S. 1931, § 89-701; C.S. 1945, § 3-801; W.S. 1957, § 1-30; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

For another provision concerning venue of proceedings to partition land, see §

1-32-102

.

As to venue of proceedings to determine heirship to land, see §

2-9-201

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Locus of injury to land. —

The district court of Wyoming had jurisdiction to restrain another from diverting the water of the stream by means of a ditch constructed in Montana, and by it carrying the water to his land in Wyoming, the locus of the injury to the owners being in Wyoming, where their ditch and lands were situated. Willey v. Decker, 11 Wyo. 496, 73 P. 210,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1903).

Locus of ditch and headgate. —

Where owners of lands in Montana have acquired, by prior appropriation, the right to use for irrigating their lands the water of a stream by means of a ditch and headgate located in Wyoming, the district court of Wyoming had jurisdiction to restrain others from diverting the water by means of ditches located in Wyoming or in Montana for the irrigation of land in Wyoming. Willey v. Decker, 11 Wyo. 496, 73 P. 210,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1903).

Foreclosure against nonresident. —

Foreclosure of city lien against realty for street improvements where correct address of nonresident owner was on file and where city omitted filing affidavit to establish defendant's residence was unknown and could not “with reasonable diligence be ascertained” was void. Elstermeyer v. Cheyenne, 57 Wyo. 256, 116 P.2d 231,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1941), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 421, 120 P.2d 599,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1942).

Action on mortgage after foreclosure and redemption. —

Since a mortgage foreclosed upon did not survive the foreclosure sale and redemption, there was no real property at issue, and an action to collect the debt after the defendants failed to pay the deficiency was improperly venued in the county where the property was located. First Southwestern Fin. Servs. v. Laird, 882 P.2d 1211,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1994).

Quoted

in

Spear v. Nicholson, 882 P.2d 1237,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1994).

Stated

in

Zweifel v. State ex rel. Brimmer, 517 P.2d 493,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1974).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Procedural Considerations in the Judicial Determination of Water Disputes,” 8 Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Lien as estate or interest in land within venue statute, 2 ALR2d 1261.

Venue of action to set aside as fraudulent conveyance of real property, 37 ALR2d 568.

§ 1-5-102.
Property situate in more than a single county.

When the property is
situate in more than one (1) county, the action may be brought in
either, but in actions to recover real property, this can only be
done when the property is an entire tract.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 76; R.S. 1887, § 2412; R.S. 1899, § 3497; C.S. 1910, § 4341; C.S. 1920, § 5610; R.S. 1931, § 89-702; C.S. 1945, § 3-802; W.S. 1957, § 1-31; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

County where personal service on defendants possible. —

Where action to foreclose a mortgage on two parcels of land some distance apart and lying in two counties was brought in one county, statutory language authorized action to be brought “in Sheridan County, where personal service could be had on both defendants.” Bank of Commerce v. Williams, 52 Wyo. 1, 69 P.2d 525,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1937).

§ 1-5-103.
Specific performance of sale contract for realty.

An action to compel the
specific performance of a contract of sale of real estate may be brought
in the county where any of the defendants reside.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 77; R.S. 1887, § 2413; R.S. 1899, § 3498; C.S. 1910, § 4342; C.S. 1920, § 5611; R.S. 1931, § 89-703; C.S. 1945, § 3-803; W.S. 1957, § 1-32; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Enforcement of lease not specific performance. —

It is doubtful if an action primarily to enforce a contract for a lease containing a number of reciprocal stipulations is an action for specific performance of a sale of real estate. Otis Oil & Gas Corp. v. Maier, 74 Wyo. 137, 284 P.2d 653,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1955).

Where action is brought in county of vendor's residence,

though land is located in another county in another judicial district, decree requiring vendor's specific performance of real estate contract operates as conveyance when vendor fails to obey it within statutory time. Cantou v. Walker, 61 Wyo. 56, 154 P.2d 530,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1945).

A decree for specific performance of real estate contract operates as deed without actual execution of conveyance if defendant fails to obey it within time faced by statute, and decree may be recorded in county where land lies. Cantou v. Walker, 61 Wyo. 56, 154 P.2d 530,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1945).

Stated

in

In re Estate of Frederick, 599 P.2d 550,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Venue of action for specific performance of contract pertaining to real property, 63 ALR2d 456.

§ 1-5-104.
Actions to be brought where cause of action arose.

Actions for the following causes shall be brought in the county where the cause or some part thereof arose:

For the recovery of a fine, forfeiture or penalty imposed by a statute. When it is imposed for an offense committed on a river or other water course or a road which is the boundary of the state or of two (2) or more counties, the action may be brought in any county bordering on the river, water course or road, and opposite to the place where the offense was committed;

Against a public officer for an act done by virtue or under color of his office, or for a neglect of his official duty;

On the official bond or undertaking of a public officer.

Actions for small claims proceedings under W.S.

1-21-201

through

1-21-205

may be brought in the county where the cause of action or some part thereof arose.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 78; R.S. 1887, § 2414; R.S. 1899, § 3499; C.S. 1910, § 4343; C.S. 1920, § 5612; R.S. 1931, § 89-704; C.S. 1945, § 3-804; W.S. 1957, § 1-33; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2021 ch. 67, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (b).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Venue as to suit for avoidance of release or satisfaction of judgment, 9 ALR2d 553.

Venue of actions or proceedings against public officers, 48 ALR2d 423.

Venue in action for malicious prosecution, 12 ALR4th 1278.

What is the judicial district “in which the claim arose” for venue purposes under 28 USC § 1391(a) and (b), 59 ALR Fed 320.

§ 1-5-105.
Actions against domestic corporations.

An action, other than
those mentioned in W.S.

1-5-101

through

1-5-103

, against a corporation created under the laws of this
state may be brought in the county in which the corporation is situate
or has its principal office or place of business. If the corporation
is an insurance company the action may be brought in the county wherein
the cause of action or some part thereof arose.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 79; R.S. 1887, § 2415; R.S. 1899, § 3500; C.S. 1910, § 4344; C.S. 1920, § 5613; R.S. 1931, § 89-705; C.S. 1945, § 3-805; W.S. 1957, § 1-34; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Action against individual and corporation. —

Under this section, it was held that an action against an individual residing in one county and a domestic corporation having its principal office in another county, for damages in consequence of their joint negligence in conducting log drives on a river, was properly brought in the county of the residence of the individual. Harrison v. Carbon Timber Co., 14 Wyo. 246, 83 P. 215,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1905).

Change of venue. —

Defendant by going to trial waived fact that original pleadings were not sent to Crook County on change of venue from Weston County, since such defect did not deprive court of jurisdiction. J.J. Mayou Mfg. Co. v. Consumers Oil & Ref. Co., 60 Wyo. 75, 146 P.2d 738,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 3

, 151 A.L.R. 1243 (1940). See Rule 12, W.R.C.P.

Cited

in

Cameron v. Lockhart, 79 Wyo. 187, 332 P.2d 65,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(1958).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Place where corporation is doing business for purposes of state venue statute, 42 ALR5th 221.

§ 1-5-106.
Actions against public carriers and railroad companies.

An action for an injury
to person or property upon a liability as a public carrier, or an
action against a railroad company, may be brought in any county through
or into which the carrier or railroad line passes.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 80; R.S. 1887, § 2416; R.S. 1899, § 3501; C.S. 1910, § 4345; C.S. 1920, § 5614; R.S. 1931, § 89-706; C.S. 1945, § 3-806; W.S. 1957, § 1-35; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cited

in

Harrison v. Carbon Timber Co., 14 Wyo. 246, 83 P. 215,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1905).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Federal Motor Carrier Act requiring designation of process agent as affecting venue, 8 ALR2d 814.

Proper forum and right to maintain action for accident causing death over or in high seas, 66 ALR2d 1002.

§ 1-5-107.
Actions against nonresidents and foreign corporations.

An action, other than
one (1) of those mentioned in W.S.

1-5-101

through

1-5-104

, against a nonresident of this state or a foreign corporation,
whether or not codefendants reside in Wyoming, may be brought in any
county where the cause of action arose or where the plaintiff resides.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 83; R.S. 1887, § 2419; R.S. 1899, § 3504; C.S. 1910, § 4348; C.S. 1920, § 5617; R.S. 1931, § 89-707; Laws 1945, ch. 56, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 3-807; W.S. 1957, § 1-36; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 157, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to service of process on nonresident motorist, see §

1-6-301

.

As to foreign corporations generally, see §§

17-16-1501

to

17-16-1534

.

As to jurisdiction and venue over nonresident manufacturers and dealers under Mobile Home Warranty Act, see §

35-18-110

.

Purpose of section. —

In passing this section and §

26-3-121

, the legislature was interested in the furnishing of a local forum for residents of this state and for nonresidents when the cause of action arises in this state. Lohman v. Jefferson Standard Life Ins. Co., 525 P.2d 1,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 1974).

Where there is nonresident plaintiff and cause of action arises and all contracts have been outside state,

this section and §

26-3-121

, absent unjustified judicial enlargement, provide for no jurisdiction in Wyoming courts over nonresidents of the state. Lohman v. Jefferson Standard Life Ins. Co., 525 P.2d 1,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 1974).

No jurisdiction of property or person. —

Where goods have been seized on attachment, a judgment rendered and sale ordered, a writ of prohibition to prevent such sale will not issue, though the court had no jurisdiction either of the property or of the person, as the office of the writ is to arrest judicial, and not ministerial, proceedings. Dobson v. Westheimer, 5 Wyo. 34, 36 P. 626,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1894).

Where tortious acts were committed. —

The exercise of undue influence upon a decedent by the widow and her son causing him to execute documents concerning property, constituted tortious acts, and venue properly existed where the tort was committed and where the cause of action arose. Spear v. Nicholson, 882 P.2d 1237,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1994).

Venue of general action by state attorney general

to enforce the laws of the state may properly be filed in the county where he has his office. Zweifel v. State, 517 P.2d 493,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1974).

Cited

in

Harrison v. Carbon Timber Co., 14 Wyo. 246, 83 P. 215,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1905); Pease Bros. v. American Pipe & Supply Co., 522 P.2d 996,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1974).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Procedural Considerations in the Judicial Determination of Water Disputes,” 8 Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Venue of action against nonresident motorist served constructively under statute, 38 ALR2d 1198.

Forum non conveniens doctrine in state court as affected by availability of alternative forum, 57 ALR4th 973.

Place where corporation is doing business for purposes of state venue statute, 42 ALR5th 221.

Effect of American citizenship or residency of libelant who has alternate forum abroad on applicability of doctrine of forum non conveniens in admiralty action brought in United States district court, 70 ALR Fed 875.

§ 1-5-108.
Actions not otherwise provided for; exception.

Every action not otherwise
provided for in this chapter shall be brought in the county in which
a defendant resides or may be summoned, except actions against an
executor, administrator, guardian or trustee, which may be brought
in the county where he was appointed or resides. If the action involves
two (2) or more defendants, the action may be brought against all
defendants in any county in which one (1) of the defendants resides
or may be summoned.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 84; R.S. 1887, § 2420; R.S. 1899, § 3505; C.S. 1910, § 4349; C.S. 1920, § 5618; R.S. 1931, § 89-708; C.S. 1945, § 3-808; W.S. 1957, § 1-37; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 157, § 1; 1985, ch. 180, § 2.

Legal malpractice.—

It was an abuse of discretion to deny a motion to dismiss a legal malpractice action for improper venue because (1) suit was not filed in the county in which a law firm and attorneys resided, had their principal place of business, and were summoned, and (2) the statute could not be read so broadly as to authorize the filing of suit in another county without the attorneys and firm being summoned in that county. Aron v. Willey, 2019 WY 122, 453 P.3d 1031,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2019).

Action against individual and corporation. —

In an action against an individual residing in one county and a corporation having its office in another county, the action was properly brought in the county where the individual resided. Harrison v. Carbon Timber Co., 14 Wyo. 246, 83 P. 215,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1905).

Replevin not local action. —

Under this section, replevin is not a local action, and need not be brought where the goods are detained and the petition need not allege the venue of the detention. 16 Wyo. 161, 92 P. 624.

Applied

in

First S.W. Fin. Servs. v. Laird, 882 P.2d 1211,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Willey v. Decker, 11 Wyo. 496, 73 P. 210,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1903); Harrison v. Carbon Timber Co., 14 Wyo. 246, 83 P. 215,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1905); Cameron v. Lockhart, 79 Wyo. 187, 332 P.2d 65,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(1958); Nicholaus v. Nicholaus, 756 P.2d 1338,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1988).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Place of personal representative's appointment as venue of action against him in his official capacity, 93 ALR2d 1199.

Venue for currency reporting offense under Currency and Foreign
Transactions Reporting Act (CFTRA) (31 USC § 5311 et seq.),
113 ALR Fed 639.

§ 1-5-109.
Actions for personal injuries or wrongful death.

An action for personal
injuries or wrongful death may be brought in the county in which the
cause of action arose or in the county in which the defendant resides
or may be summoned.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 180, § 1.